Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201516-708
Special assessments; invalidity; reassessment.

Whenever any special assessment upon any lot or lots or lands or parcels of land in a city of the first class is found to be invalid and uncollectible, shall be adjudged to be void by a court of competent jurisdiction, or is paid under protest and recovered by suit, because of any defect, irregularity, or invalidity in any of the proceedings or on account of the failure to observe and comply with any of the conditions, prerequisites, and requirements of any statute or ordinance, the mayor and city council may relevy the special assessment upon the lot or lots or lands or parcels of land in the same manner as other special assessments are levied, without regard to whether the formalities, prerequisites, or conditions prior to equalization have been had or not.

Laws 1925, c. 47, § 1, p. 187;

C.S.1929, § 16-707;

R.S.1943, § 16-708;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 27.
August 30, 2015
Reassessment of benefits is provided for when original assessment is invalid. Shanahan v. Johnson, 170 Neb. 399, 102 N.W.2d 858 (1960).